src/noun-sme-morph.txt
LEXICON DEAHKIT !!= * __@CODE@__ like AIGI but plural only
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
! +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:%>X5jd%> Px1C ;
! +N+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:%>X5jd9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp+Err/Sub:%>X5jd R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:%>X5jd9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Err/Sub:%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Err/Sub:%>X5jdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>X5jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Sub:%>X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:%>X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:%>%^DISIMPjn%> PxPlComC ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; not very plausible
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6žin K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žat K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:»X6žak K ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žijddá%> Px1V ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:»X6žijd R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijdda K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:»X6žijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijgujn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X6žij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON DIEDUT !!= * __@CODE@__ like ALBMI but plural only
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:%>X4k K ;
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:%>X5jd%> Px1C ;
! +N+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:%>X5jd9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp+Err/Sub:%>X5jd R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:%>X5jd9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Err/Sub:%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Err/Sub:%>X5jdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>X5jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Sub:%>X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:%>X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:%>%^DISIMPjn%> PxPlComC ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; not very plausible
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6žin K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žat K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:»X6žak K ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žijddá%> Px1V ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:»X6žijd R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijdda K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:»X6žijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijgujn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X6žij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON BADJOSAT   !!= * __@CODE@__ Pl. bajus:badjosat
 +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X4X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>X4@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X8@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +N+Ess:%>X4in K ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:%> K ; !SUB
! +N+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X2at K ;
! +N+Pl+Nom:%>X2ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>X2ijd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>X2ijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>X2ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažžan K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažža%>n%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>X4t K ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> Px1C ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X4W4#heapmi%> HEAPMI ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess:»X4W4#heapmi%>X1n K ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess+Err/Sub:»X4W4#heapmi%>X7n K ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess:»X4W4#heapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess:»X4W4#heapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X4W4#his ATTR ;
! +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X4W4#his VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON ATTR
 +N+Use/-Spell:%>X8 GEAHTES ;

LEXICON BADJOSATLONG   !!= * __@CODE@__ Pl. bajus:badjosat
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>X4 R ;
! +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X8@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
! +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +N+Ess:%>X4in K ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:%> K ; !SUB
! +N+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X2at K ;
! +N+Pl+Nom:%>X2ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>X2ijd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>X2ijnna K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>X2ijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>X2ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažžan K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažža%>n%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>X4t K ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> Px1C ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X4W4#heapmi%> HEAPMI ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Ess+Use/-Spell:»X4W4#heapmi%>X1n K ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Ess+Use/-Spell+Err/Sub:»X4W4#heapmi%>X7n K ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Ess+Use/-Spell:»X4W4#heapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Ess+Use/-Spell:»X4W4#heapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X4W4#his ATTR ;
! +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X4W4#his VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +N+Use/-Spell:%>X4 GEAHTES ;
